Missouri, session 2026, SB1424.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 370.020, 370.080, and 370.200, RSMo,
are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 370.020, 370.080, and 370.200, to read as
follows:
370.020. The certificate of organization shall state:
(1) The name of the proposed credit union and the
city, town, or village in which its business office is
located;
(2) The names and addresses of the subscribers to the
certificate, and the number of shares subscribed by each;
(3) A statement that organization as a credit union is
desired under this particular law;
(4) The par value of the regular shares, which shall
not exceed one hundred dollars;
(5) The par value of membership shares, if any, which
shall not be less than [twenty-five] one dollar nor more
than one hundred dollars.
370.080. 1. The membership shall consist of the
organizers and such persons, societies, associations,
copartnerships and corporations as have been duly elected to
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1424 2
membership and have subscribed to one or more general
shares, or one membership share and/or membership fee when
required, and have paid for the same in the whole or in
part, with the entrance fee as required by the bylaws, and
have complied with such other requirements as the
certificate of organization may contain.
2. A credit union shall be composed of one or more
groups of persons. The members of each such individual group
must share:
(1) A common occupation, association, employer or;
(2) A geographic area which may include all those
persons who reside or work in a city not within a county or
a county, in which the main office of the credit union is
located as reported on the National Credit Union
Administration (NCUA) 2006 year-end 5300 call report, and
counties contiguous to such areas as may be approved by the
director. The director shall not allow a geographic area
credit union to expand beyond counties contiguous to a city
not within a county or a county in which its main office is
located. The director shall not allow a credit union to
expand its geographic area due to a relocation of the credit
union's main office.
3. No individual shall be eligible for membership in a
credit union on the basis of the relationship of such
individual to another person who is eligible for membership
in such credit union unless the individual is a member of
the immediate family or household, as such terms are defined
by the commission, of such person. Except as provided in
section 370.340, once a person becomes a member of a credit
union in accordance with this chapter, such person or
organization may remain a member of such credit union until

SB 1424 3
the person or organization chooses to withdraw from the
membership of the credit union.
4. Each credit union may, at the option of the board,
create one or more classes of shares which shall be known as
"membership share" representing the member's ownership
interest in the credit union on such terms and conditions as
the board of directors may determine, not inconsistent with
the bylaws, provided that each membership share shall have a
par value of not less than [twenty-five] one dollar nor more
than one hundred dollars. A membership share shall not be
pledged as security on any loan.
5. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this
chapter to the contrary, in the event of liquidation of the
assets of the credit union, the membership share shall be at
risk, uninsured, and shall be subordinated to the claims of
all nonmembers and participate in the assets of the credit
union after all creditors and holders of all other shares,
and the National Credit Union Administration.
370.200. 1. The board of directors shall have the
general management of the affairs, funds, and records of the
corporation, and unless they shall be specifically reserved
to the members or delegated to the president or operating
manager, it shall be the special duty of the directors:
(1) To act upon applications for membership in the
credit union;
(2) To determine, from time to time, rates of interest
which shall be charged on loans;
(3) To fix the maximum number of shares which may be
held by and the maximum amount, both secured and unsecured,
which may be loaned to any one member, such limitations to
apply alike to all members; and

SB 1424 4
(4) To have charge of the investment of funds of the
credit union, other than loans to members, and to perform
such other duties as the members may, from time to time,
authorize.
2. Additionally, the board shall have the duty to:
(1) Authorize the employment and compensation of the
chief executive officer;
(2) Approve an annual operating budget for the credit
union;
(3) Declare dividends on regular shares;
(4) Accept and act upon resignations and determine and
fill vacancies on the board of directors, credit committee,
and, if the bylaws so provide, the supervisory committee
until the election or appointment of qualified successors;
(5) Amend the bylaws except for those provisions in
other sections of this chapter specifically reserved for
membership action; and
(6) Consider an appeal of a person denied membership
by the credit union.
3. Unless specifically prohibited by the bylaws,
directors may participate in and act at any meeting of the
board through the use of a telephone, video conference, or
other electronic means. Participation in the meeting in
this manner shall constitute attendance, and participation
by directors in a meeting may be in any combination of in-
person, telephone, or other electronic or virtual means
provided that all directors participating can communicate
simultaneously. Any action taken during such meeting shall
have the same binding and legal effect as if conducted fully
in person. Votes and other actions of the directors may be
conducted by electronic means, including remote or online
systems, provided that board approved procedures are

SB 1424 5
established to verify the identity of voting directors and
to ensure the integrity of the process.
✓